Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.02
Abortion; emergency situation; physician; duties.

When an emergency situation compels the performance of an abortion, the physician shall inform the woman, prior to the abortion if possible, of the medical indications supporting his or her judgment that an abortion is necessary to avert her death or to avert substantial impairment of a major bodily function.

Laws 1993, LB 110, § 4.